Connecticut, session 2026, HB05027.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 2-15a of the general statutes be amended to permit
members of the General Assembly to elect to use a digital advertising
service on social media platforms to reach their constituents in lieu of a
traditional mailing for official legislative communications.